Tennessee, session 114, SB1081.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 67, Chapter 6, Part 1, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
(a) The commissioner, in consultation with the state treasurer, shall establish a
sales tax remittance schedule that allows dealers making sales of tangible personal
property to reasonably offset the burden of transaction fees associated with the
collection of sales tax on those sales. The schedule must extend the holding time of
SB1081
002835
- 1 -

accumulated sales tax for a period within which dealers can reasonably recoup their
transaction costs before remittance to the department. This holding time must be
derived from:
(1) This state's total sales tax remittance during the previous year;
(2) The percentage of transactions conducted through credit card and
debit card tender;
(3) This state's fees to its residents for credit card transactions, including
service and convenience fees; and
(4) The risk-free federal funds rate as defined by the federal reserve.
(b) The commissioner shall monitor the holding time on a biannual basis for
appropriateness.
(c) This section does not require the department to change its current processes
or forms for collecting and remitting sales tax other than establishing an extended
timeframe for remittance.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 002835